Utah statutes.
63A-3-107.   Travel expenses of executive branch officers and employees.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, and subject to approval by the executive director, the director of the
Division of Finance shall make rules governing in-state and out-of-state
travel expenses.
(2)  Unless otherwise provided by statute, a travel expense rule established
under Subsection (1):
(a)  is applicable to an officer or employee of the executive branch, except
as provided under Subsection (2)(b);
(b)  is applicable to an officer or employee of higher education, unless
higher education pays the costs of the travel expenses; and
(c)  may be applicable to a government entity that is not included under
Subsection (2)(a), if the government entity adopts the travel expense
provisions by reference to:
(i)  this section; or
(ii)  the rule establishing the travel expense provisions.
(3)  The Division of Finance shall make the travel expense rules on the basis
of:
(a)  a mileage allowance; and
(b)  reimbursement for other travel expenses incurred.
(4)  The travel expense rules may allow modification, when justified, to meet
special circumstances encountered in official attendance at a conference,
convention, meeting, or other official business.
(5) (a)  An officer or employee of the executive branch may not incur
obligations for travel outside Utah without the advance approval of the
director of the Division of Finance.
(b)  The director of the Division of Finance may delegate the authority to
approve travel outside the state to an executive director or a designee of the
executive director of a state department or agency.
(c)  The approval under Subsection (5)(a) or (b), shall include a
certification as to the availability of funds.
(6)  A member of a board may decline to receive travel expenses for the
member's service.
